Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1428DP.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1428DP (1) 91
sc/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. REPEAL. Section 97B.53A, Code 2025, is repealed.
EXPLANATION
The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with
the explanation’s substance by the members of the general assembly.
This bill repeals the Iowa public employees’ retirement
system’s obligation to, upon a member’s termination of covered
employment prior to the member’s retirement, send to the
member’s last known address a notice that contains the balance
and status of the member’s accounts and explains the member’s
possible courses of action under Code chapter 97B.
LSB 1428DP (1) 91
-1- sc/ns 1/1